Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202281-12,198
Applicant resources, defined.

Applicant resources means:

(1) Dollars donated to the applicant specifically for the project by any combination of one or more of the following:

(a) An individual;

(b) An organization that is exempt from income tax under section 501(c) of the Internal Revenue Code; or

(c) Any nongovernmental organization; and

(2) Any direct or indirect funding for the project from any federal, state, or local government, excluding any matching funds received pursuant to the Nebraska Rural Projects Act.

Laws 2021, LB40, § 4.